en: Beers from Czech republic, Czech beers
bg: Чешка бира
de: Tschechische Biere
fr: Bières de République tchèque
hr: Piva iz Češke
hu: Cseh sörök, Sörök Csehországból
it: Birre ceche, Birre della Repubblica Ceca
lt: Čekiškas alus, alus iš Čekijos
nl: Tsjechische bieren
pl: Piwa czeskie

en: Danish beers, Beers from Denmark
bg: Датска бира
da: danske øl, øl fra Danmark
hr: Danska piva
hu: Dán sörök
lt: Daniškas alus, alus iš Danijos

en: Estonian beers, Beers from Estonia
bg: Естонска бира
da: estiske øl
fr: Bières estoniennes
hr: Estonska piva
hu: Észt sörök
lt: Estiškas alus, alus iš Estijos

en: Beers from Germany, German beers
bg: Германска бира
da: tyske øl
de: Deutsche Biere
es: Cervezas de alemania
fi: saksalaiset oluet
fr: Bières allemandes, Bières d'Allemagne
hr: Piva iz Njemačke
hu: Német sörök, Sörök Németországból
it: Birre tedesche, Birre della Germania
lt: Vokiškas alus, alus iš Vokietijos
nl: Duitse bieren
pl: Piwa niemieckie
pt: Cervejas da Alemanha
ro: Beri germane, Beri Germania, Bere germană, Bere Germania, Bere germana

de: Münchener Biere, Münchener Bier
hu: Müncheni sörök

en: Bavarian beers
de: Bayerische Biere, Bayerisches Bier
fr: Bières bavaroises
hr: Bavarska piva
hu: Bajor sörök
it: Birre bavaresi, Birre della Bavaria
lt: Bavariškas alus, alus iš Bavarijos
nl: Beierse bieren, Bieren uit Beieren
pl: Piwa bawarskie
ro: Beri bavareze, Bere bavareză, Bere bavareza

en: Beers from Bremen
de: Bremer Biere, Bremer Bier
hr: Piva iz Bremena
hu: Brémai sörök
nl: Bremense bieren, Bieren uit Bremen

en: Kölsch
de: Kölsch
hr: Kölsch
nl: Keulse bieren

en: Norwegian beers
bg: Норвежка бира
da: norske øl
hr: Norveška piva
hu: Norvég sörök
lt: Norvegiškas alus

en: Beers from Poland, Polish beers
bg: Полска бира
da: polske øl
de: Biere aus Polen
fr: Bières polonaises
hr: Piva iz Poljske
hu: Lengyel sörök
it: Birre polacche
lt: Lenkiškas alus, alus iš Lenkijos
nl: Bieren uit Polen
pl: Piwa polskie
ro: Beri poloneze, Bere poloneză, Bere poloneza

en: Spanish beers
bg: Испанска бира
da: spanske øl
de: Spanische Biere
fr: Bières espagnoles
hr: Španjolska piva
hu: Spanyol sörök
it: Birre spagnole
lt: Ispaniškas alus
nl: Spaanse bieren

en: Swedish beers
bg: Шведска бира
da: svenske øl
de: Schwedische Biere
es: Cervezas suecas
fr: Bières suédoises
hr: Švedska piva
hu: Svéd sörök
it: Birre svedesi
lt: Švediškas alus
nl: Zweedse bieren

en: Ukrainian beers, Beers from Ukraine
da: ukrainske øl
hu: Ukrán sörök
lt: Ukrainietiškas alus, alus iš Ukrainos

en: Beers from United Kingdom
de: Biere aus dem Vereinigten Königreich
fr: Bières du Royaume Uni, Bières anglaises
hr: Piva iz Ujedinjenog Kraljevstva
hu: Brit sörök, Angol sörök, Sörök az Egyesült Királyságból
it: Birre del Regno Unito
lt: Alus iš Jungtinės Karalystės, Angliškas alus
nl: Britse bieren

en: Scottish beers
da: skotske øl
de: Schottische Biere
es: Cervezas escocesas
fr: Bières écossaises
hr: Škotska piva
hu: Skót sörök
it: Birre scozzesi
lt: Škotiškas alus
nl: Schotse bieren

en: Hungarian beers, Beers from Hungary
de: Ungarische Biere
hu: Magyar sörök

en: Alcohol-free cocktails, Alcohol-free juice and syrup-based cocktails
fr: Cocktails sans alcool, Cocktail sans alcool à base de jus de fruits et de sirop
hr: Kokteli bez alkohola
hu: Alkoholmentes koktélok
lt: Nealkoholiniai kokteiliai
zh: 无酒精鸡尾酒

en: Non-alcoholic beers, non-alcoholic beer, Alcohol-free beer, Alcohol-free beers, Beers with less than 1.2° alcohol
bg: Безалкохолна бира
de: Alkoholfreie Biere, Alkoholfreies Bier
es: Cervezas sin alcohol
fi: alkoholittomat oluet
fr: Bières sans alcool, bière sans alcool, Bières à moins d'1.2° d'alcool
hr: Bezalkoholna piva
hu: Alkoholmentes sörök
it: Birre analcoliche, birre senza alcol
lt: Nealkoholinis alus, alus be alkoholio, alus su mažiau nei 1.2° alkoholio
nl: Alcoholvrije bieren, Alcoholvrij bier
pl: Piwa bezalkoholowe, Piwo bezalkoholowe
ro: Beri fără alcool, Bere fără alcool, Bere nealcoolizată, Bere nealcoolizata
zh: 无酒精啤酒

en: Ginger beer
de: Ingwerbier
fi: Inkivääriolut
fr: Bière de gingembre, ginger beer
hr: Đumbirovo pivo
hu: Gyömbérsör
it: Birre ginger
ja: ジンジャービア
lt: Imbierinis alus
nl: Gemberbieren, Gemberbier, gunger ale
pl: Piwa imbirowe
ro: Bere de ghimbir
zh: 姜啤

en: Non-alcoholic cherry kriek
lt: Nealkoholinis vyšnių kriek